Connecticut, session 2026, HB05454.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. Subsections (a) to (e), inclusive, of section 29-30 of the 2026
supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
substituted in lieu thereof (Effective October 1, 2026):
(a) The fee for each permit originally issued under the provisions of
subsection (b) of section 29-28 for the sale at retail of firearms shall be
two hundred dollars and for each renewal of such permit two hundred
dollars. The fee for each state permit originally issued under the
provisions of subsection (c) of section 29-28, for the carrying of pistols
and revolvers shall be one hundred forty dollars plus sufficient funds as
required to be transmitted to the Federal Bureau of Investigation to
cover the cost of a national criminal history records check. The local
permitting authority, as defined in section 29-28, or the chief of police of
a law enforcement unit of any federally recognized Native American
tribe within the borders of the state, as referenced in subsection (c) of
HB5454 / File No. 272 1

HB5454 File No. 272
section 29-28, shall forward sufficient funds for the national criminal
history records check to the commissioner no later than five business
days after receipt by the local permitting authority, or such chief of
police of a law enforcement unit of any federally recognized Native
American tribe, of the application for the temporary state permit.
[Seventy] Except as provided in subsection (e) of this section, seventy
dollars shall be retained by the local permitting authority, or such chief
of police of a law enforcement unit of any federally recognized Native
American tribe. Upon approval by the local permitting authority, or
such chief of police of a law enforcement unit of any federally
recognized Native American tribe, of the application for a temporary
state permit, seventy dollars shall be sent to the commissioner. The fee
to renew each state permit originally issued under the provisions of
subsection (c) of section 29-28 shall be seventy dollars. Upon deposit of
such fees in the General Fund, ten dollars of each fee shall be credited
within thirty days to the appropriation for the Department of
Emergency Services and Public Protection to a separate nonlapsing
account for the purposes of the issuance of permits under subsections
(b) and (c) of section 29-28.
(b) A local permit originally issued before October 1, 2001, whether
for the sale at retail of pistols and revolvers or for the carrying of pistols
and revolvers, shall expire five years after the date it becomes effective
and each renewal of such permit shall expire five years after the
expiration date of the permit being renewed. On and after October 1,
2001, no local permit for the carrying of pistols and revolvers shall be
renewed.
(c) A state permit originally issued under the provisions of section 29-
28 for the carrying of pistols and revolvers shall expire five years after
the date such permit becomes effective and each renewal of such permit
shall expire five years after the expiration date of the state permit being
renewed and such renewal shall not be contingent on the renewal or
issuance of a local permit. A temporary state permit issued for the
carrying of pistols and revolvers shall expire sixty days after the date it
becomes effective, and may not be renewed.
HB5454 / File No. 272 2

HB5454 File No. 272
(d) The renewal fee required pursuant to subsection (a) of this section
shall apply for each renewal which is requested not earlier than thirty-
one days before, and not later than thirty-one days after, the expiration
date of the state permit being renewed.
(e) No fee or portion of any fee paid under the provisions of this
section for issuance or renewal of a state permit shall be refundable
except if (1) such permit for which the fee or portion was paid was not
issued or renewed, or (2) the local permitting authority fails to discharge
any obligation applicable to such local permitting authority pursuant to
subdivision (1) of subsection (b) of section 29-28a or subsection (b) or (c)
of section 29-29 within the applicable time limits established under said
subdivision or subsection, in which case the local permitting authority
shall refund seventy dollars to the applicant. The portion of the fee
expended on the national criminal history records check for any such
permit that was not issued or renewed shall not be refunded.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 29-30(a) to (e)
PS Joint Favorable
HB5454 / File No. 272 3

HB5454 File No. 272
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact:
Municipalities Effect FY 27 $ FY 28 $
Municipal Police Departments; Potential Minimal Minimal
Various Municipalities Revenue
Loss
Explanation
The bill results in potential minimal revenue loss to local permitting
authorities to the extent they fail to complete their duties within the
existing statutorily established timeframes and must issue refunds.
Local permitting authorities are either a chief of police or the chief
executive officer of the town.
The Out Years
The annualized ongoing fiscal impact identified above would
continue into the future subject to any refunds issued.
HB5454 / File No. 272 4

HB5454 File No. 272
OLR Bill Analysis
HB 5454
AN ACT CONCERNING THE REFUND OF CERTAIN FIREARM
PERMIT FEES.